ro-RO: Tensiune de control sau conectivitate la poartă: Intrare CV; Ieșire CV; Intrare gate/trigger; Ieșire gate/trigger; Fără CV/Gate; Intrare sync (ceas analogic); Ieșire sync (ceas analogic); Altele
bg-BG: Управляващо напрежение или свързване към управляващ вход: CV вход; CV изход; Gate/Trigger вход; Gate/Trigger изход; Без CV/Gate; Sync вход (аналогов часовник); Sync изход (аналогов часовник); Друга
ko: 제어 전압 또는 게이트 연결 방식: CV 입력; CV 출력; 게이트/트리거 입력; 게이트/트리거 출력; CV/게이트 없음; 동기화(아날로그 클럭) 입력; 동기화(아날로그 클럭) 출력; 기타
cs: Řídicí napětí nebo připojení hradla: Vstup CV; Výstup CV; Vstup Gate/Trigger; Výstup Gate/Trigger; Bez CV/Gate; Vstup Sync (analogové hodiny); Výstup Sync (analogové hodiny); Jiné
hu: Vezérlőfeszültség vagy kapukapcsolat: CV bemenet; CV kimenet; Gate/Trigger bemenet; Gate/Trigger kimenet; Nincs CV/Gate; Szinkron (analóg órajel) bemenet; Szinkron (analóg órajel) kimenet; Egyéb
en: Control voltage or gate connectivity: CV in; CV out; Gate/Trigger in; Gate/Trigger out; No CV/Gate; Sync (analog clock) in; Sync (analog clock) out; Other
th: การเชื่อมต่อระบบแรงดันไฟควบคุมหรือเกต: CV In; CV Out; Gate/Trigger In; Gate/Trigger Out; ไม่มี CV/Gate; Sync (นาฬิกาอะนาล็อก) In; Sync (นาฬิกาอะนาล็อก) Out; อื่นๆ
fi: Ohjausjännite tai porttikytkentä: CV in; CV out; Gate/Trigger in; Gate/Trigger out; Ei CV/Gate-liitäntöjä; Sync (analoginen kello) in; Sync (analoginen kello) out; Muu
fr: Type de tension ou connectivité de commande: Entrée CV; Sortie CV; Entrée Gate/Trigger; Sortie Gate/Trigger; Aucun CV/Gate; Entrée Sync (horloge analogique); Sortie Sync (horloge analogique); Autre
nb: Kontrollspenning eller gate-tilkobling: CV inn; CV ut; Gate/Trigger inn; Gate/Trigger ut; Ingen CV/Gate; Sync (analog klokke) inn; Sync (analog klokke) ut; Annet
pt-PT: Tensão de controlo ou conectividade da porta: Entrada CV; Saída CV; Entrada gate/trigger; Saída gate/trigger; Sem CV/gate; Entrada de sincronização (relógio analógico); Saída de sincronização (relógio analógico); Outra
pl: Napięcie sterujące lub łączność bramki: Wejście CV; Wyjście CV; Wejście Gate/Trigger; Wyjście Gate/Trigger; Brak CV/Gate; Wejście Sync (zegar analogowy); Wyjście Sync (zegar analogowy); Inne
es: Voltaje de control o conectividad de puerta: Entrada CV; Salida CV; Entrada Gate/Trigger; Salida Gate/Trigger; Sin CV/Gate; Entrada de sincro (reloj analógico); Salida de sincro (reloj analógico); Otro
pt-BR: Conectividade de tensão de controle ou gate: Entrada de CV; Saída de CV; Entrada de gate/acionador (trigger); Saída de gate/acionador (trigger); Sem CV/Gate; Entrada de sincronização (relógio analógico); Saída de sincronização (relógio analógico); Outro
ja: 制御電圧またはゲート接続: CVイン; CVアウト; ゲート / トリガーイン; ゲート / トリガーアウト; CV / ゲートなし; シンク (アナログクロック) イン; シンク (アナログクロック) アウト; その他
vi: Điện áp điều khiển hoặc kết nối cổng: Đầu vào CV; Đầu ra CV; Đầu vào Gate/Trigger; Đầu ra Gate/Trigger; Không có CV/Gate; Đầu vào Sync (xung nhịp analog); Đầu ra Sync (xung nhịp analog); Khác
sv: Styrspänning eller grindanslutning: CV in; CV ut; Gate/Trigger in; Gate/Trigger ut; Ingen CV/Gate; Synk in (analog klocka); Synk ut (analog klocka); Annan
sk-SK: Riadiace napätie alebo pripojenie hradla: Vstup CV; Výstup CV; Vstup Gate/Trigger; Výstup Gate/Trigger; Bez CV/Gate; Vstup synchronizácie (analógové hodiny); Výstup synchronizácie (analógové hodiny); Iné
nl: Stuurspanning of poortconnectiviteit: CV in; CV out; Gate/trigger in; Gate/trigger out; Geen CV/gate; Sync (analoge klok) in; Sync (analoge klok) out; Overig
de: Steuerspannung oder Gate-Anschluss: CV-Eingang; CV-Ausgang; Gate/Trigger-Eingang; Gate/Trigger-Ausgang; Kein CV/Gate; Sync-Eingang (Analog Clock); Sync-Ausgang (Analog Clock); Sonstige
el: Τάση ελέγχου ή συνδεσιμότητα πύλης: CV in; CV out; Είσοδος Gate/Trigger; Έξοδος Gate/Trigger; Χωρίς CV/Gate; Είσοδος Sync (αναλογικό ρολόι); Έξοδος Sync (αναλογικό ρολόι); Άλλο
hr-HR: Kontrolni napon ili povezivost vrata: CV ulaz; CV izlaz; Gate/Trigger ulaz; Gate/Trigger izlaz; Bez CV/Gatea; Sync ulaz (analogni sat); Sync izlaz (analogni sat); Ostalo
sl-SI: Krmilna napetost ali povezljivost vrat: Vhod CV; Izhod CV; Vhod za Gate/Trigger; Izhod za Gate/Trigger; Brez CV/Gate; Vhod za sinhronizacijo (analogna ura); Izhod za sinhronizacijo (analogna ura); Drugo
ru: Управляющее напряжение или подключение затвора: Вход CV (управляющее напряжение); Выход CV; Вход Gate/Trigger; Выход Gate/Trigger; Без CV/Gate; Вход Sync (аналоговый синхроимпульс); Выход Sync; Другое
zh-TW: 控制電壓或閘極連接方式: CV 輸入; CV 輸出; 閘門/觸發輸入; 閘門/觸發輸出; 無 CV/Gate; 同步 (類比時脈) 輸入; 同步 (類比時脈) 輸出; 其他
da: Styrespænding eller gate-tilslutning: CV ind; CV ud; Gate/Trigger ind; Gate/Trigger ud; Ingen CV/Gate; Sync (analog clock) ind; Sync (analog clock) ud; Anden
lt-LT: Valdymo įtampos arba vartų jungiamumas: CV įvestis; CV išvestis; Sklendės / paleidiklio įvestis; Sklendės / paleidiklio išvestis; Nėra CV / sklendės; Sinchronizavimo (analoginio laikrodžio) įvestis; Sinchronizavimo (analoginio laikrodžio) išvestis; Kita
zh-CN: 控制电压或栅极连接: CV 输入; CV 输出; Gate/Trigger 输入; Gate/Trigger 输出; 无 CV/Gate; 同步（模拟时钟）输入; 同步（模拟时钟）输出; 其他
it: Tensione di controllo o connettività del gate: Ingresso CV; Uscita CV; Ingresso gate/trigger; Uscita gate/trigger; Nessun CV/gate; Ingresso sync (clock analogico); Uscita sync (clock analogico); Altro
tr: Kontrol gerilimi veya gate bağlantı uyumluluğu: CV giriş; CV çıkış; Gate/Tetikleyici giriş; Gate/Tetikleyici çıkış; CV/Gate yok; Senkronizasyon (analog saat) girişi; Senkronizasyon (analog saat) çıkışı; Diğer